Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3316
Changes made by Laws 2024, LB164; applicability.

The changes made by Laws 2024, LB164, apply to any inland port authority existing prior to, on, or after April 17, 2024.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 12.